dictsource/shn_rules
// Shan (Tai Yay) pronunciation rules (Shan script)

// Consonants
.L01 ၵ ၶ င ၸ သ ၺ တ ထ ၼ ပ ၽ ၾ မ ယ ရ လ ဝ ႁ ဢ
.L02 ႃ ိ ီ ု ူ ​ေ ​ႄ ် ၢ ဵ ႅ ႆ ွ ႂ် ျ ြ

.replace
       ႐    0
       ႑    1
       ႒    2
       ႓    3
       ႔    4
       ႕    5
       ႖    6
       ႗    7
       ႘    8
       ႙    9

.group ၵ // U+1075
         ၵ         k
        _) ၵ (_     ka5
         ၵေႃ      kO
         ၵၢႆ       ka:i
         ၵွႆ       kOi
         ၵုၺ်     kui
         ၵူၺ်     koi
         ၵႂ်       kaWi


.group ၶ // U+1076
         ၶ         k_h
         _) ၶ (_    k_ha5
         ၶေႃ      k_hO
         ၶၢႆ       k_ha:i
         ၶွႆ       k_hOi
         ၶႂၢႆ       k_hOa:i
         ၶုၺ်      k_hui
         ၶူၺ်      k_hoi
         ၶႂ်        k_haWi

.group င // U+1004
         င        N
        _) င (_    Na5
         ငေႃ      NO
         ငၢႆ     Na:i
         ငွႆ      NOi
         ငႂၢႆ     NOa:i
         ငုၺ်    Nui
         ငူၺ်    Noi

.group ၸ // U+1078
         ၸ         tS;
         _) ၸ (_    tS;a5
         ၸေႃ      tS;O
         ၸၢႆ       tS;a:i
         ၸွႆ        tS;Oi
         ၸုၺ်      tS;ui
         ၸူၺ်      tS;oi
         ၸႂ်       tS;aWi

.group သ // U+101E
         သ         s
         _) သ (_   sa5
         သေႃ      sO
         သၢႆ       sa:i
         သွႆ       sOi
         သႂၢႆ      sOa:i
         သူၺ်     soi
         သႂ်       saWi

.group ၺ // U+107A
       ၺ         J
       _) ၺ (_   Ja5

.group တ // U+1010
       တ         t
       _) တ (_   ta5
       တေႃ      tO
       တၢႆ       ta:i
       တွႆ       tOi
       တုၺ်     tui
       တူၺ်     toi
        တႂ်     taWi

.group ထ // U+1011
       ထ        t_h
       _) ထ (_  t_ha5
       ထေႃ      t_hO
       ထွႆ       t_hOi
       ထုၺ်      t_hui
       ထႂ်       t_haWi

.group ၼ // U+107C
       ၼ         n
       _) ၼ (_    na5
       ၼေႃ      nO
       ၼၢႆ       na:i
       ၼွႆ       nOi
       ၼူၺ်     noi
       ၼႂ်      naWi

.group ပ // U+1015
       ပ          p
       _) ပ (_    pa5
       ပေႃ       pO
       ပၢႆ       pa:i
       ပွႆ       pOi
       ပုၺ်      pui
       ပူၺ်      poi
       ပႂ်      paWi

.group ၽ // U+107D
       ၽ         p_h
       _) ၽ (_   p_ha5
       ၽေႃ     p_hO
       ၽၢႆ       p_ha:i
       ၽွႆ       p_hOi
       ၽုၺ်      p_hui
       ၽူၺ်      p_hoi
       ၽႂ်      p_haWi

.group ၾ // U+107E
       _) ၾ       p_h       // Except for Eastern dialects, which use 'f'.
      _) ၾ (_     p_ha5
       ၾ          f
       ၾၢႆ       fa:i

.group မ // U+1019
       မ         m
      _) မ (_    ma5
       မေႃ       mO
       မၢႆ       ma:i
       မွႆ       mOi
       မူၺ်      moi
       မႂ်       maWi

.group ယ // U+101A
       ယ         j
      _) ယ (_    ja5
       ယေႃ       jO
       ယၢႆ       ja:i
       ယွႆ       jOi
       ယုၺ်     jui
       ယူၺ်     joi
       ယႂ်      jaWi

.group ရ // U+101B
         ရ         R
      _) ရ (_    Ra5

.group လ // U+101C
       လ         l
      _) လ (_    la5
       လေႃ     lO
       လၢႆ       la:i
       လွႆ       lOi
       လုၺ်     lui
       လူၺ်      loi
        လႂ်      laWi

.group ဝ // U+101D
       ဝ         w
      _) ဝ (_    wa5
       ဝၢႆ       wa:i
       ဝွႆ       wOi
       ဝုၺ်     wui
       ဝူၺ်      woi
       လႂ်      waWi

.group ႁ // U+1081
       ႁ         h
      _) ႁ (_    ha5
       ႁေႃ     hO
       ႁၢႆ       ha:i
       ႁွႆ       hOi
       ႁုၺ်     hui
       ႁူၺ်      hoi
       ႁႂ်      haWi

.group ဢ // U+1022
       ဢ     ?
       _) ဢ (_   ?a5
      ဢေႃ     ?O
      ဢၢႆ     ?a:i
      ဢွႆ      ?Oi
      ဢုၺ်    ?ui
      ဢူၺ်    ?oi
       ဢႂ်     ?aWi

.group // no character group
  ၊  _
  ။  _:

.group ၷ // U+1077: rare, used for sounds in other languages
         ၷ         g

.group ၹ // U+1079: rare, used for sounds in other languages
         ၹ         z

.group ၻ // U+107B: rare, used for sounds in other languages
         ၻ         d

.group ႀ // U+107F: rare, used for sounds in other languages
         ႀ         T

.group ၿ // U+1080: rare, used for sounds in other languages
         ၿ         b


// Vowels

.group   ႃ
              ႃ      a

.group   ိ
              ိ        i5
              .L01) ိဝ်       iw
              .L01) ိင်       ig
              .L01) ိၼ်     in
              .L01) ိမ်       im
              .L01) ိၵ်      ik
              .L01) ိတ်      it
              .L01) ိပ်       ip
              .L01) ိုဝ်      i.w
              .L01) ိုင်      i.g
              .L01) ိုၼ်     i.n
              .L01) ိုမ်     i.m
              .L01) ိုၵ်     i.k
              .L01) ိုတ်     i.t
              .L01) ိုပ်      i.p
              .L01) ိူဝ်      Ww
              .L01) ိူင်      Wg
              .L01) ိူၼ်     Wn
              .L01) ိူမ်      Wm
              .L01) ိူၵ်     Wk
              .L01) ိူတ်     Wt
              .L01) ိူပ်     Wp

.group   ီ
              ီ        i

.group   ဵ
              ဵ            e
              .L01) ဵဵဵဵဝ်     ew
              .L01) ဵင်     eg
              .L01) ဵၼ်     en
              .L01) ဵမ်     em
              .L01) ဵၵ်     ek
              .L01) ဵတ်    et
              .L01) ဵပ်     ep

.group   ႅ
              ႅ          E
              .L01) ႅႅႅဝ်     Ew
              .L01) ႅင်     Eg
              .L01) ႅၼ်    En
              .L01) ႅမ်     Em
              .L01) ႅၵ်     Ek
              .L01) ႅတ်    Et
              .L01) ႅပ်     Ep

.group   ​ေ
             ​ေ       ae

.group   ႄ
              ႄ       E

.group   ု
                 ု       u5
          .L01) ုင်      ug
          .L01) ုၼ်    un
          .L01) ုမ်      um
          .L01) ုၵ်     uk
          .L01) ုတ်     ut
          .L01) ုပ်      up

.group   ူ
            ူ           u
           .L01) ူဝ်     o
           .L01) ူင်     og
           .L01) ူၼ်   on
           .L01) ူမ်     om
           .L01) ူၵ်    ok
           .L01) ူတ်     ot
           .L01) ူပ်     op

.group   ႆ
              ႆ        @i

.group   ၢ
                ၢ       a:
          .L01) ၢဝ်     a:a:w
          .L01) ၢင်     a:g
          .L01) ၢၼ်    a:n
          .L01) ၢမ်     a:m
          .L01) ၢၵ်     a:k
          .L01) ၢတ်    a:t
          .L01) ၢပ်    a:p


.group   ွ
          ွ (L02       O

.group   ႂ
          ႂ  (L02   O

.group  ႂ်
        ႂ်       aWi

.group  ြ
            ြ       ra

.group   ျ
             ျ      ja


.group  ဝ်
            ဝ်     w
           .L01) ဝ်      aw

.group  င်
           င်            g
          .L01) င်       ag

.group  ၼ်
           ၼ်           n
          .L01) ၼ်      an

.group  မ်
           မ်            m
          .L01) မ်       am

.group  ၵ်
           ၵ်           k
          .L01) ၵ်      ak

.group တ်
           တ်           t
          .L01) တ်      at

.group  ပ်
            ပ်           p
          .L01) ပ်      ap


// 6 tones , 1 is default

.group  ႇ
          .L02) ႇ      2
             
.group  ႈ
          .L02) ႈ      3

.group  း
          .L02) း      4

.group  ႉ
          .L02) ႉ      5

.group  ႊ
          .L02) ႊ      6
